Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2612
Violations; penalty.

Any person who shall be found in violation of section 39-2603 shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor. Each day's violation shall constitute a separate offense.

Laws 1971, LB 398, § 12;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 220.